North Carolina statutes. Chapter 160A. Cities and Towns.
Article 4A. Extension of Corporate Limits.
§ 160A-58.56.
Provision of water and sewer service.

The municipality shall provide water and sewer service to the annexed area as required by plans for extension under

G.S. 160A-58.53(3)

within three and one-half years of the effective date of the annexation ordinance except as provided in subdivision (b)(4) of this section. If (i) the residents in the existing city boundaries are served by a public water or sewer system, or by a combination of a public water or sewer system and one or more nonprofit entities providing service by contract with the public system, (ii) the annexing municipality does not provide that service within the existing city boundaries, (iii) the area to be annexed is in an area served by the public water or sewer system, and (iv) the municipality has no responsibility through an agreement with the public water or sewer system to pay for the extension of lines to areas annexed to the city, the city shall have no financial responsibility for the extension of water and sewer lines under this section. For purposes of this provision, “public water or sewer system” means a water or sewer authority formed under Article 1 of Chapter 162A of the General Statutes; a metropolitan water or sewerage district formed under Article 4 or Article 5 of Chapter 162A of the General Statutes; a county water or sewer district formed under Article 6 of Chapter 162A of the General Statutes; a sanitary district formed under Article 2 of Chapter 130A of the General Statutes; a county-owned water or sewer system; a municipal-owned water or sewer system; a water or sewer utility created by an act of the General Assembly; or a joint agency providing a water or sewer system by interlocal agreement under Article 20 of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes.

Prior to the adoption of the annexation ordinance, the municipality shall offer to each eligible property owner of real property located within the area proposed to be annexed an opportunity to obtain water or sewer service, or both, at no cost other than periodic user fees based upon usage as follows:

After passage of the resolution of intent, the property owner of real property located within the area proposed to be annexed shall be notified in writing, as provided in G.S. 160A-58.55(d), within five business days of the passage of the resolution of intent, of the opportunity to have water and sewer lines and connections installed at no cost to the property owner. The notice shall state that a request for extending water and sewer lines does not waive the right to contest the annexation. The property owners of real property located within the area proposed to be annexed shall be allowed 65 days from the date of the passage of the resolution of intent to respond yes or no to the opportunity. Any property owner of a parcel that is an existing customer of the municipality’s water or sewer, whether provided by the municipality or by a third party under contract with the municipality, shall be deemed to respond yes to the opportunity, whether or not the property owner returns the notification.

At the close of the 65-day period, the municipality shall determine if the eligible property owners of a majority of the parcels to be annexed have responded favorably. A majority of the property owners of a single parcel of real property must respond favorably before the municipality may count that parcel of real property as responding favorably.

If the property owners of a majority of the parcels located within the area proposed to be annexed respond favorably, the municipality shall do all of the following:

Provide water and sewer lines, service lines, and connections at no cost other than periodic user fees to all real property for which an owner responded favorably if the annexation ordinance is adopted. The right to receive water and sewer lines shall run with the land.

Notify, within five days of the close of the 65-day period under subdivision (2) of this subsection, those property owners of real property located within the area proposed to be annexed who failed to respond or responded negatively that the property owners of a majority of the parcels located within the area proposed to be annexed responded favorably and offer a second opportunity for that property owner to respond favorably within 30 days.

If the property owners of a majority of the parcels located within the area proposed to be annexed fail to respond favorably to the offer to obtain water and sewer services made under this section, the municipality may nevertheless proceed with the annexation. If the municipality proceeds with the annexation when the property owners of a majority of the parcels located within the area proposed to be annexed fail to respond favorably to the offer to obtain water and sewer services, the municipality is not required to provide water and sewer services to any property owners in the area that is annexed. If the municipality does provide water and sewer services, and if a property owner requests those services, the municipality may charge the property owner for the connection to a residential lot as provided in subsection (d) of this section during the first five years following the effective date of the annexation. After five years, and only if connection is requested by a property owner in accordance with subsection (e) of this section, the municipality may charge for the connection according to the municipality’s policy.

The process required by subsection (b) of this section shall be completed by the municipality at least 30 days prior to the public hearing. The report required by

G.S. 160A-58.53

shall include the results of the process required by subsection (b) of this section.

Any property owner of the real property located within the area described in the annexation ordinance may apply to participate in the water and sewer system after the completion of the process required by subsection (b) of this section. For a property owner of real property located within the area described in the annexation ordinance applying within the first year, that property owner may be charged an amount not to exceed fifty percent (50%) of average cost of the installation of the water and sewer for a residential lot. For a property owner of real property located within the area described in the annexation ordinance applying within the second year, that property owner may be charged an amount not to exceed sixty percent (60%) of average cost of the installation of the water and sewer for a residential lot. For a property owner of real property located within the area described in the annexation ordinance applying within the third year, that property owner may be charged an amount not to exceed seventy percent (70%) of average cost of the installation of the water and sewer for a residential lot. For a property owner of real property located within the area described in the annexation ordinance applying within the fourth year, that property owner may be charged an amount not to exceed eighty percent (80%) of average cost of the installation of the water and sewer for a residential lot. For a property owner of real property located within the area described in the annexation ordinance applying within the fifth year, that property owner may be charged an amount not to exceed ninety percent (90%) of average cost of the installation of the water and sewer for a residential lot. Charges pursuant to this section shall be made when the water and sewer connection is operable.

Notwithstanding Article 16 of this Chapter, the municipality may not charge, for any reason, any property owner within the area described in the annexation ordinance, for the installation or use of the water or sewer system unless that property owner is, or has requested to become, a customer of the water or sewer system.

The initial installation of water or sewer connection lines to property shall be completed without charge to the property owner. Title to water or sewer connection lines shall vest in the property owner following completion of the initial installation. The property owner shall be responsible for maintenance and repair of water and sewer connection lines on the owner’s property following the initial installation.

If the municipality is unable to provide water or sewer service within three and one-half years, as required by this section, due to permitting delays that are caused through no fault of the municipality, the municipality may petition the Local Government Commission for a reasonable time extension.

For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

“At no cost other than periodic user fees.” — The municipality may not charge the property owner who responded favorably under subdivision (b)(3) of this section for any costs associated with the installation of the water or sewer system. The municipality may not charge a property owner who applies to participate in the water and sewer system under subsection (d) of this section prior to the first periodic user fee charge, and on that bill the owner may be charged no more then as provided in subsection (d) of this section.

“Average installation of a connection for a residential lot.” — The average of the cost for residential installations from curb to residence, including connection and tap fees, in the area described in the annexation ordinance.

History.

2011-396, s. 9.

§ 160A-58.57.
Contract with rural fire department.

If the area to be annexed described in a resolution of intent passed under G.S. 160A-58.55(c) includes an area in an insurance district defined under

G.S. 153A-233

, a rural fire protection district under Article 3A of Chapter 69 of the General Statutes, or a fire service district under Article 16 of Chapter 153A of the General Statutes, and a rural fire department was on the date of adoption of the resolution of intent providing fire protection in the area to be annexed, then the city (if the rural fire department makes a written request for a good faith offer, and the request is signed by the chief officer of the fire department and delivered to the city clerk no later than 15 days before the public hearing) is required to make a good faith effort to negotiate a five-year contract with the rural fire department to provide fire protection in the area to be annexed.

If the area is a rural fire protection district or a fire service district, then an offer to pay annually for the term of the contract the amount of money that the tax rate in the district in effect on the date of adoption of the resolution of intent would generate based on property values on January 1 of each year in the area to be annexed which is in such a district is deemed to be a good faith offer of consideration for the contract.

If the area is an insurance district but not a rural fire protection district or fire service district, then an offer to pay annually over the term of the contract the amount of money which is determined to be the equivalent of the amount which would be generated by multiplying the fraction of the city’s general fund budget in that current fiscal year which is proposed to be expended for fire protection times the tax rate for the city in the current year, and multiplying that result by the property valuation in the area to be annexed which is served by the rural fire department is deemed to be a good faith offer of consideration for the contract; Provided that the payment shall not exceed the equivalent of fifteen cents (15¢) on one hundred dollars ($100.00) valuation of annexed property in the district according to county valuations for the current fiscal year.

Any offer by a city to a rural fire department which would compensate the rural fire department for revenue loss directly attributable to the annexation by paying such amount annually for five years, is deemed to be a good faith offer of consideration for the contract.

Under subsections (b), (c), or (d) of this section, if the good faith offer is for first responder service, an offer of one-half the calculated amount under those subsections is deemed to be a good faith offer.

This section does not obligate the city or rural fire department to enter into any contract.

The rural fire department may, if it feels that no good faith offer has been made, appeal to the Local Government Commission within 30 days following the passage of an annexation ordinance. The rural fire department may apply to the Local Government Commission for an order staying the operation of the annexation ordinance pending the outcome of the review. The Commission may grant or deny the stay in its discretion upon such terms as it deems proper, and it may permit annexation of any part of the area described in the ordinance concerning which no question for review has been raised, provided that no other appeal under

G.S. 160A-58.60

is pending.

The Local Government Commission may affirm the ordinance, or if the Local Government Commission finds that no good faith offer has been made, it shall remand the ordinance to the municipal governing board for further proceedings, and the ordinance shall then not become effective unless the Local Government Commission finds that a good faith offer has been made.

Any party to the review under subsection (h) may obtain judicial review in accordance with Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.

History.

1983, c. 636, s. 21; 1987, c. 827, s. 1; 2011-396, ss. 2, 9.

Cross References.

As to effective date of annexation ordinances adopted under Article 4A of Chapter 160A, see

G.S. 160A-58.9

A.

§ 160A-58.58.
Assumption of debt.

If the city has annexed any area which is served by a rural fire department and which is in an insurance district defined under

G.S. 153A-233

, a rural fire protection district under Article 3A of Chapter 69 of the General Statutes or a fire service district under Article 16 of Chapter 153A of the General Statutes, then upon the effective date of annexation if the city has not contracted with the rural fire department for fire protection, or when the rural fire department ceases to provide fire protection under contract, then the city shall pay annually a proportionate share of any payments due on any debt (including principal and interest) relating to facilities or equipment of the rural fire department, if the debt was existing at the time of adoption of the resolution of intent, with the payments in the same proportion that the assessed valuation of the area of the district annexed bears to the assessed valuation of the entire district on the date the annexation ordinance becomes effective or another date for valuation mutually agreed upon by the city and the fire department.

The city and rural fire department shall jointly present a payment schedule to the Local Government Commission for approval and no payment may be made until such schedule is approved.

History.

1983, c. 636, s. 23; 1998-150, s. 16; 2011-396, s. 3.

§ 160A-58.59.
Contract with private solid waste collection firms.

If the area to be annexed described in a resolution of intent passed under G.S. 160A-58.55(c) includes an area where a firm (i) meets the requirements of subsection (b) of this section, (ii) on the ninetieth day preceding the date of adoption of the resolution of intent or resolution of consideration was providing solid waste collection services in the area to be annexed, (iii) on the date of adoption of the resolution of intent is still providing such services, and (iv) by reason of the annexation the firm’s franchise with a county or arrangements with third parties for solid waste collection will be terminated, the city shall do one of the following:

Contract with the firm for a period of two years after the effective date of the annexation ordinance to allow the firm to provide collection services to the city in the area to be annexed for sums determined under subsection (f) of this section.

Pay the firm for the firm’s economic loss, with one-third of the economic loss to be paid within 30 days of the termination and the balance paid in 12 equal monthly installments during the next succeeding 12 months. Any remaining economic loss payment is forfeited if the firm terminates service to customers in the annexation area prior to the effective date of the annexation.

Make other arrangements satisfactory to the parties.

To qualify for the options set forth in subsection (a) of this section, a firm must have done one of the following:

Subsequent to receiving notice of the annexation in accordance with subsection (d) of this section, filed with the city clerk at least 10 days prior to the public hearing a written request to contract with the city to provide solid waste collection services containing a certification, signed by an officer or owner of the firm, that the firm serves at least 50 customers within the county at that time.

Contacted the city clerk pursuant to public notice published by the city, pursuant to G.S. 160A-58.55(d), at least 10 days before the hearing and provided to the city clerk a written request to contract with the city to provide solid waste collection services. The request must contain a certification signed by an officer or owner of the firm that the firm serves at least 50 customers within the county at that time.

Firms shall file notice of provision of solid waste collection service with the city clerk of all cities located in the firm’s collection area or within five miles thereof.

At least four weeks prior to the date of the informational meeting, the city shall provide written notice of the resolution of intent to all firms serving the area to be annexed. The notice shall be sent to all firms that filed notice in accordance with subsection (c) of this section by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the address provided by the firm under subsection (c) of this section.

The city may require that the contract contain:

A requirement that the firm post a performance bond and maintain public liability insurance coverage;

A requirement that the firm agree to service customers in the annexed area that were not served by that firm on the effective date of annexation;

A provision that divides the annexed area into service areas if there were more than one firm being contracted within the area, such that the entire area is served by the firms, or by the city as to customers not served by the firms;

A provision that the city may serve customers not served by the firm on the effective date of annexation;

A provision that the contract can be cancelled in writing, delivered by certified mail to the firm in question with 30 days to cure substantial violations of the contract, but no contract may be cancelled on these grounds unless the Local Government Commission finds that substantial violations have occurred, except that the city may suspend the contract for up to 30 days if it finds substantial violation of health laws;

Performance standards, not exceeding city standards existing at the time of notice published pursuant to G.S. 160A-49(b) [160A-58.55(d)] with provision that the contract may be cancelled for substantial violations of those standards, but no contract may be cancelled on those grounds unless the Local Government Commission finds that substantial violations have occurred;

A provision for monetary damages if there are violations of the contract or of performance standards.

If the services to be provided to the city by reason of the annexation are substantially the same as rendered under the franchise with the county or arrangements with the parties, the amount paid by the city shall be at least ninety percent (90%) of the amount paid or required under the existing franchise or arrangements. If such services are required to be adjusted to conform to city standards or as a result of changes in the number of customers and as a result there are changes in disposal costs (including mileage and landfill charges), requirements for storage capacity (dumpsters and/or residential carts), and/or frequency of collection, the amount paid by the city for the service shall be increased or decreased to reflect the value of such adjusted services as if computed under the existing franchise or arrangements. In the event agreement cannot be reached between the city and the firm under this subsection, the matters shall be determined by the Local Government Commission.

The firm may, if it contends that no contract has been offered, appeal to the Local Government Commission within 30 days following passage of an annexation ordinance. The firm may appeal to the Local Government Commission for an order staying the operation of the annexation ordinance pending the outcome of the review. The Commission may grant or deny the stay upon such terms as it deems proper. If the Local Government Commission finds that the city has not made an offer which complies with this section, it shall remand the ordinance to the municipal governing board for further proceedings, and the ordinance shall not become effective until the Local Government Commission finds that such an offer has been made. Either the firm or the city may obtain judicial review in accordance with Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.

A firm which has given notice under subsection (a) of this section that it desires to contract, and any firm that the city believes is eligible to give such notice, shall make available to the city not later than 30 days following a written request of the city, sent by certified mail return receipt requested, all information in its possession or control, including but not limited to operational, financial and budgetary information, necessary for the city to determine if the firm qualifies for the benefits of this section and to determine the nature and scope of the potential contract and/or economic loss. The firm forfeits its rights under this section if it fails to make a good faith response within 30 days following receipt of the written request for information from the city, provided that the city’s written request so states by specific reference to this section.

As used in this section, the following terms mean:

Economic loss. — A sum equal to 15 times the average gross monthly revenue for the three months prior to the passage of the resolution of intent or resolution of consideration, as applicable under subsection (a) of this section, collected or due the firm for residential, commercial, and industrial collection service in the area annexed or to be annexed; provided that revenues shall be included in calculations under this subdivision only if policies of the city will provide solid waste collection to those customers such that arrangements between the firm and the customers will be terminated.

Firm. — A private solid waste collection firm.

History.

1985, c. 610, s. 4; 1987, c. 827, s. 1; 1989, c. 598, s. 9; 1998-150, s. 17; 2006-193, s. 2; 2006-259, s. 53; 2011-396, ss. 4, 9.

Cross References.

As to effective date of annexation ordinances adopted under Article 4A of Chapter 160A, see

G.S. 160A-58.9

A.

§ 160A-58.60.
Appeal.

Within 60 days following the adoption of the annexation ordinance, any property owner of real property located within the area described in the annexation ordinance who believes that property owner will suffer material injury by reason of the failure of the municipal governing board to comply with the procedure or to meet the requirements set forth in this Part as they apply to the annexation may file a petition in the superior court of the county in which the municipality is located seeking review of the action of the governing board.

Such petition shall explicitly state what exceptions are taken to the action of the governing board and what relief the petitioner seeks. Within 10 days after the petition is filed with the court, the person seeking review shall serve copies of the petition by registered mail, return receipt requested, upon the municipality.

Within 15 days after receipt of the copy of the petition for review or within such additional time as the court may allow, the municipality shall transmit to the reviewing court both of the following:

A transcript of the portions of the municipal journal or minute book in which the procedure for annexation has been set forth.

A copy of the report setting forth the plans for extending services to the annexed area as required in

G.S. 160A-58.53

.

If two or more petitions for review are submitted to the court, the court may consolidate all such petitions for review at a single hearing, and the municipality shall be required to submit only one set of minutes and one report as required in subsection (c) of this section.

At any time before or during the review proceeding, any petitioner or petitioners may apply to the reviewing court for an order staying the operation of the annexation ordinance pending the outcome of the review. The court may grant or deny the stay in its discretion upon such terms as it deems proper, and it may permit annexation of any part of the area described in the ordinance concerning which no question for review has been raised.

The court shall fix the date for review of annexation proceedings under this Part, which review date shall be expeditious and without unnecessary delays. The review shall be conducted by the court without a jury. The court may hear oral arguments and receive written briefs and may take evidence intended to show one or more of the following:

That the statutory procedure was not followed.

That the provisions of

G.S. 160A-58.53

were not met.

That the provisions of

G.S. 160A-58.54

have not been met.

That the provisions of

G.S. 160A-58.50

have not been met.

The court may affirm the action of the governing board without change, or it may order any of the following:

Remand the ordinance to the municipal governing board for further proceedings if procedural irregularities are found to have materially prejudiced the substantive rights of any of the petitioners.

Remand the ordinance to the municipal governing board for amendment of the boundaries to conform to the provisions of

G.S. 160A-58.54

if it finds that the provisions of

G.S. 160A-58.54

have not been met; provided, that the court cannot remand the ordinance to the municipal governing board with directions to add area to the municipality which was not included in the notice of public hearing and not provided for in plans for service.

Remand the report to the municipal governing board for amendment of the plans for providing services to the end that the provisions of

G.S. 160A-58.53

are satisfied or to correct errors in [the] municipal governing board’s estimates that fall below the standards in

G.S. 160A-58.63

.

Declare the ordinance null and void, if the court finds that the ordinance cannot be corrected by remand as provided in subdivisions (1), (2), or (3) of this subsection.If any municipality shall fail to take action in accordance with the court’s instructions upon remand within 90 days following entry of the order embodying the court’s instructions, the annexation proceeding shall be deemed null and void.

Any party to the review proceedings, including the municipality, may appeal to the Court of Appeals from the final judgment of the superior court under rules of procedure applicable in other civil cases. The superior court may, with the agreement of the municipality, permit annexation to be effective with respect to any part of the area concerning which no appeal is being made and which can be incorporated into the municipality without regard to any part of the area concerning which an appeal is being made.

If part or all of the area annexed under the terms of an annexation ordinance is the subject of an appeal to the superior court, Court of Appeals, or Supreme Court on the effective date of the ordinance, then the ordinance shall be deemed amended to make the effective date with respect to such area the first June 30th at least six months following the date of the final judgment of the superior court or appellate division, or the first June 30th at least six months from the date the municipal governing board completes action to make the ordinance conform to the court’s instructions in the event of remand. For the purposes of this subsection, a denial of a petition for rehearing or for discretionary review shall be treated as a final judgment.

If a petition for review is filed under subsection (a) of this section or an appeal is filed under G.S. 160A-58.57(g) or G.S. 160A-58.59(g) and a stay is granted, then the time periods of three and one-half years or G.S. 160A-58.55(n) are each extended by the lesser of the length of the stay or one year for that annexation.

The provisions of subsection (i) of this section shall apply to any judicial review authorized in whole or in part by G.S. 160A-58.57(i) or G.S. 160A-58.57(g).

In any proceeding related to an annexation ordinance appeal under this section, a municipality shall not state a claim for lost property tax revenue caused by the appeal. Nothing in this Article shall be construed to mean that as a result of an appeal a municipality may assert a claim for property tax revenue lost during the pendency of the appeal.

Any settlement reached by all parties in an appeal under this section may be presented to the superior court in the county in which the municipality is located. If the superior court, in its discretion, approves the settlement, it shall be binding on all parties without the need for approval by the General Assembly.

If a final court order is issued against the annexing municipality, costs in the action, including reasonable attorneys’ fees for such aggrieved person having a freehold interest in the real property located within the area described in the annexation ordinance, may be charged to the municipality.

History.

2011-396, s. 9 2012-11, s. 5; 2013-410, s. 15.

§ 160A-58.61.
Annexation recorded.

Whenever the limits of a municipality are enlarged in accordance with the provisions of this Part, it shall be the duty of the mayor of the municipality to cause an accurate map of such annexed territory, together with a copy of the ordinance duly certified, to be recorded in the office of the register of deeds of the county or counties in which such territory is situated and in the office of the Secretary of State.
The documents required to be filed with the Secretary of State under this section shall be filed not later than 30 days following the effective date of the annexation ordinance.
All documents shall have an identifying number affixed thereto and shall conform in size in accordance with rules prescribed by the Secretary.
Failure to file within 30 days shall not affect the validity of the annexation.
Any annexation shall be reported as part of the Boundary and Annexation Survey of the United States Bureau of the Census.

History.

1959, c. 1009, s. 7; 1973, c. 426, s. 74; 1987, c. 715, s. 8; c. 879, s. 3; 1989, c. 440, s. 9; 1991, c. 586, s. 3; 2011-396, s. 5.

Cross References.

As to effective date of certain annexation ordinances adopted from January 1, 1987, to August 3, 1987, see

G.S. 160A-58.9

.

§ 160A-58.62.
Authorized expenditures.

Municipalities initiating annexations under the provisions of this Part are authorized to make expenditures for surveys required to describe the property under consideration or for any other purpose necessary to plan for the study and/or annexation of unincorporated territory adjacent to the municipality. In addition, following final passage of the annexation ordinance, the annexing municipality shall have authority to proceed with expenditures for construction of water and sewer lines and other capital facilities and for any other purpose calculated to bring services into the annexed area in a more effective and expeditious manner prior to the effective date of annexation.

History.

1959, c. 1009, s. 8; 1973, c. 426, s. 74; 2011-396, s. 6.

§ 160A-58.63.
Population and land estimates.

In determining population and degree of land subdivision for purposes of meeting the requirements of

G.S. 160A-58.54

, the municipality shall use methods calculated to provide reasonably accurate results. In determining whether the standards set forth in

G.S. 160A-58.54

have been met on appeal to the superior court under

G.S. 160A-58.60

, the reviewing court shall accept the estimates of the municipality unless the actual population, total area, or degree of land subdivision falls below the standards in G.S. 160A-58.54:

As to population, if the estimate is based on the number of dwelling units in the area multiplied by the average family size in such area, or in the township or townships of which such area is a part, as determined by the last preceding federal decennial census; or if it is based on a new enumeration carried out under reasonable rules and regulations by the annexing municipality; provided, that the court shall not accept such estimates if the petitioners demonstrate that such estimates are in error in the amount of ten percent (10%) or more.

As to total area, if the estimate is based on an actual survey, or on county tax maps or records, or on aerial photographs, or on some other reasonably reliable map used for official purposes by a governmental agency, unless the petitioners on appeal demonstrate that such estimates are in error in the amount of five percent (5%) or more.

As to degree of land subdivision, if the estimates are based on an actual survey, or on county tax maps or records, or on aerial photographs, or on some other reasonably reliable source, unless the petitioners on appeal show that such estimates are in error in the amount of five percent (5%) or more.

History.

2011-396, s. 9.

§ 160A-58.64.
Referendum prior to involuntary annexation ordinance.

After the adoption of the resolution of intent under this Part, the municipality shall place the question of annexation on the ballot. The municipal governing board shall notify the appropriate county board or boards of elections of the adoption of the resolution of intent and provide a legible map and clear written description of the proposed annexation area.

In accordance with

G.S. 160A-58.55

, the municipal governing board shall adopt a resolution setting the date for the referendum and so notify the appropriate county board or boards of elections.

The county board or boards of elections shall cause legal notice of the election to be published. That notice shall include the general statement of the referendum. The referendum shall be conducted, returned, and the results declared as in other municipal elections in the municipality. Only registered voters of the proposed annexation area shall be allowed to vote on the referendum.

The referendum of any number of proposed involuntary annexations may be submitted at the same election; but as to each proposed involuntary annexation, there shall be an entirely separate ballot question.

The ballots used in a referendum shall submit the following proposition:

“[ ] FOR [ ] AGAINST

The annexation of (clear description of the proposed annexation area).”

If less than a majority of the votes cast on the referendum are for annexation, the municipal governing body may not proceed with the adoption of the annexation ordinance or begin a separate involuntary annexation process with respect to that proposed annexation area for at least 36 months from the date of the referendum. If a majority of the votes cast on the referendum are for annexation, the municipal governing body may proceed with the adoption of the annexation ordinance under

G.S. 160A-58.55

.

History.

2012-11, s. 1; 2014-115, s. 15.1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2014-115, s. 15.1, effective August 11, 2014, substituted “G.S. 160A-58.55” for “G.S. 163-58.55” in subsection (b).

§§ 160A-58.65 through 160A-58.89.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 8. Recording and Reporting.

§ 160A-58.90.
Recording and Reporting.

Annexations made under this Article shall be recorded and reported in the same manner as under

G.S. 160A-29

.

To be enforceable, any written agreement with a person having a freehold interest in real property regarding annexation shall be recorded in the county register of deeds office in which the real property lies.

History.

2011-396, s. 11.